Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2311
Corporation; property; bonds; exempt from taxation.

The corporation and all properties at any time owned by it and only while owned by it and the income from the properties, and all bonds issued by it and the income from the bonds, shall be exempt from taxation in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 11.